Wisconsin, session 2025, AB326.
do enact as follows:AB326,1Section 1. 73.03 (78) of the statutes is created to read:73.03 (78) To establish and maintain a local grant writing and compliance assistance program. Under the program, in each year from 2027 through 2030 in 2 grant cycles per year, the department shall award grants to applicant political subdivisions, as defined in s. 66.0602 (1) (c), with populations of less than 7,500 to be used for obtaining grant writing and compliance assistance services. All of the following apply to the program under this subsection:(a) Grant writing and compliance assistance services grants under this subsection may be used only to obtain services for grants related to any of the following purposes:1. Public works.2. Transportation infrastructure.3. Public safety.4. Utility costs.5. Cybersecurity.(b) The department shall prescribe a simple and clear application that is reasonably accessible to political subdivisions with limited staffing resources. An application under this paragraph shall list all factors upon which the department will award and prioritize grants. An application under this paragraph shall require only the following information be provided by an applicant:1. The identity of the applicant political subdivision, including the county in which the political subdivision is located.2. The name and contact information of the individual responsible for the application.3. The purpose under par. (a) for which grant writing or compliance assistance services are requested.4. A brief description of the project for which the grant writing or compliance assistance is requested.5. An estimate of the amount of the grant award for the grant for which grant writing or compliance assistance is requested.(c) In each year in which this subsection applies, the department shall prioritize grants for political subdivisions that have not previously received a grant under this subsection.(d) A grant under this subsection may not exceed $5,000.(e) No later than December 31, 2029, the department shall submit a report to the joint committee on finance evaluating the program under this subsection. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab326 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab326 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB326 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB326 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB326: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting